Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 77.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201021-177
Filings required for conversion; effective
date.

(ULLCA
1008) (a) After a plan of conversion is approved:

(1) a converting limited
liability company shall deliver to the Secretary of State for filing articles
of conversion, which must be signed as provided in subsection (a) of section
21-119 and must include:

(A)
a statement that the limited liability company has been converted into another
organization;

(B)
the name and form of the organization and the jurisdiction of its governing
statute;

(C)
the date the conversion is effective under the governing statute of the converted
organization;

(D)
a statement that the conversion was approved as required by the Nebraska Uniform
Limited Liability Company Act; and

(E) a statement that the conversion was approved as
required by the governing statute of the converted organization; and

(2) if the converting
organization is not a converting limited liability company, the converting
organization shall deliver to the Secretary of State for filing a certificate
of organization, which must include, in addition to the information required
by subsection (b) of section 21-117:

(A) a statement that the converted organization was
converted from another organization;

(B) the name and form of that converting organization
and the jurisdiction of its governing statute; and

(C) a statement that the conversion
was approved in a manner that complied with the converting organization's
governing statute.

(b)
A conversion becomes effective:

(1) if the converted organization is a limited liability
company, when the certificate of organization takes effect; and

(2) if the converted
organization is not a limited liability company, as provided by the governing
statute of the converted organization.

Laws 2010, LB888, § 77.
January 1, 2011